Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202646-744
Order; publication; effective; when.

Any order adopted pursuant to section 46-712, 46-718, 46-719, 46-725, or 46-726 shall be published once each week for three consecutive weeks in a local newspaper published or of general circulation in the area involved, the last publication of which shall be not less than seven days prior to the date set for the effective date of the order. The publication shall provide a general description of the text of all controls adopted or amended and shall identify all locations where a copy of the full text of the proposed controls may be obtained. The full text of all controls adopted shall be available to the public upon request at least thirty days prior to the effective date of the controls.

Such order shall become effective on the date specified by the adopting district, Chief Water Officer, department, or board, as applicable.

Laws 1982, LB 375, § 9;

Laws 1986, LB 894, § 29;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 46-673.07;

Laws 1996, LB 108, § 27;

Laws 1997, LB 188, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1998), § 46-656.21;

Laws 2004, LB 962, § 84;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 238.